Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0403

No agency power of member as member.

(1) A member is not an agent of a limited cooperative association solely by reason of being a member.

(2) A person's status as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited cooperative association because of the person's conduct.

[ 2019 c 37 s 403.]